Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Part applies to proceedings begun before September 1, 2014,
regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued. L
2012, c 236, §2.

[§551G-1] Short title. This chapter
may be cited as the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings
Jurisdiction Act. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next